Washington statutes.
RCW 36.64.100

Conferences to study regional and governmental problems—Contracts with other governmental agencies—Grants and gifts—Consultants.

The conference is authorized to contract generally and to enter into any contract with the federal government, the state, any municipal corporation and/or other governmental agency for the purpose of conducting the study of regional problems of mutual concern, and shall have the power to receive grants and gifts in furtherance of the program. The conference may retain consultants if deemed advisable.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 84 s 3.]